uz.dic
abxazchala/Z
adipla/Z
aybla/Z
alaksira/Z
alda/Z
allala/Z
angishvona/Z
arabchala/Z
armanchala/Z
asosla/Z
afg’onchala/Z
aya/Z
baybayla/Z
barqira/Z
bahbahla/Z
beza/Z
belilla/Z
behbehla/Z
bidilla/Z
biqvnla/Z
bilqilla/Z
bobilla/Z
boybo’yla/Z
boronala/Z
boshla/Z
bo’g’chala/Z
bo’kala/Z
bulg’ala/Z
bura/Z
burqira/Z
burchi/Z
butuila/Z
vag’vagla/Z
vajvujla/Z
vaqilla/Z
vang’illa/Z
variatsiyala/Z
vahimasira/Z
vig’illa/Z
viqviqla/Z
vishvishla/Z
voydodla/Z
voshilla/Z
galla/Z
gijbangla/Z
gipsla/Z
guvulla/Z
gungurla/Z
gursilla/Z
dazmolla/Z
dambala/Z
dastakla/Z
depsi/Z
dildira/Z
distilla/Z
dorila/Z
duddudla/Z
do’qangla/Z
dupilla/Z
dursilla/Z
yog’sira/Z
yoqla/Z
yolchi/Z
yengilla/Z
yetinqira/Z
javra/Z
jamla/Z
jig’illa/Z
jilovla/Z
jipsla/Z
joyla/Z
junji/Z
zamla/Z
zaryadla/Z
zipilla/Z
zichla/Z
zuvla/Z
ivirsi/Z
izla/Z
iilikla/Z
ilgakla/Z
ili/Z
inventarla/Z
inqilla/Z
irilla/Z
isla/Z
yo’qla/Z
yo’rma/Z
ishqala/Z
iyala/Z
kakra/Z
kappala/Z
katakla/Z
kepakla/Z
kergila/Z
kirkilla/Z
kishanla/Z
klassifikatsiyala/Z
komplektla/Z
koordinatsiyala/Z
koshinla/Z
ko’z-ko’zla/Z
ko’lla/Z
kulumsi/Z
kundoshla/Z
ko’riksa/Z
kursilla/Z
kutkila/Z
qabzi/Z
qavi/Z
qazi/Z
qaychila/Z
qaqirla/Z
qaldira/Z
qamchila/Z
qanotla/Z
qarg’ishla/Z
qarshila/Z
qatimla/Z
qatronla/Z
qashovla/Z
qiyola/Z
qiyqangla/Z
qiypangla/Z
qiqirla/Z
qimmatsira/Z
qirqira/Z
qirsilla/Z
qisilinqira/Z
qistoqla/Z
qitirla/Z
qma/Z
qo’zg’a/Z
ququla/Z
qo’lma-qo’lla/Z
qura/Z
qo’riqla/Z
quroqla/Z
qurumla/Z
qutqae/Z
qo’shmoqla/Z
lang’illa/Z
la’natla/Z
liqilla/Z
lippala/Z
lirsilla/Z
loyqala/Z
losla/Z
loyala/Z
maddala/Z
mazutla/Z
ma’qulla/Z
merovsira/Z
mijiqla/Z
mildira/Z
miltira/Z
mixla/Z
mog’orla/Z
mudra/Z
muqa/Z
mo’ltangla/Z
mo’nkilla/Z
muchchila/Z
nayzala/Z
namakobla/Z
narxla/Z
natijala/Z
negizla/Z
niqla/Z
nimtala/Z
novdala/Z
no’qila/Z
no’xtala/Z
obmotkala/Z
og’o’la/Z
oksidla/Z
olisla/Z
omochla/Z
oriyentirla/Z
ohla/Z
ochilinqira/Z
payqa/Z
palyonla/Z
panjala/Z
papala/Z
parla/Z
parchinla/Z
pahpahla/Z
piypasla/Z
pirilla/Z
pichirla/Z
pishtla/Z
poygirla/Z
poyla/Z
ponala/Z
poroxla/Z
probkala/Z
po’killa/Z
po’panakla/Z
po’rtilla/Z
rangla/Z
ratifikatsiyala/Z
rejala/Z
retushla/Z
ruhla/Z
sayla/Z
salangla/Z
sana/Z
sapchi/Z
sarg’ayinqira/Z
sahifala/Z
sekinla/Z
senla/Z
serkilla/Z
sizla/Z
siyrakla/Z
singi/Z
sirala/Z
sirma/Z
sovi/Z
sodala/Z
solmoqla/Z
stakanla/Z
so’vla/Z
sudra/Z
suyka/Z
so’lqilla/Z
surga/Z
so’roqla/Z
suf-kufla/Z
tabrikla/Z
tayinla/Z
takomilla/Z
taqala/Z
taqymla/Z
taqsimla/Z
tambala/Z
tanbehla/Z
tang’i/Z
tapilla/Z
tarashla/Z
tarvaqayla/Z
tatala/Z
tafsirla/Z
taxminla/Z
tashvishsira/Z
ta’birla/Z
ta’kidla/Z
teja/Z
tenti/Z
tepala/Z
terchila/Z
tizginla/Z
tikla/Z
tilikla/Z
timirskila/Z
ting’illa/Z
tinti/Z
tirakla/Z
tirilla/Z
tirna/Z
titkila/Z
tisha/Z
tobla/Z
tozala/Z
tolqonla/Z
tormozla/Z
tugalla/Z
to’g’na/Z
tuyoqla/Z
tuzla/Z
to’qimla/Z
tula/Z
tulla/Z
to’mtoqla/Z
to’nka/Z
tupukla/Z
turla/Z
turtkila/Z
tuta/Z
tutunla/Z
tushla/Z
o’vla/Z
o’g’irla/Z
uddala/Z
uyg’urchala/Z
o’ymala/Z
ukrainchala/Z
o’qi/Z
ula/Z
o’mganla/Z
o’pkala/Z
o’ramala/Z
o’rmala/Z
o’rta/Z
o’smoqla/Z
ustarala/Z
o’toqla/Z
o’xsha/Z
o’chinqira/Z
uchuqla/Z
ushoqla/Z
uya-tsizlai/Z
forschala/Z
fransuzchala/Z
xarjla/Z
xezla/Z
xinala/Z
xirqira/Z
xixxixla/Z
xlorla/Z
xomakla/Z
xotirjamla/Z
xoxola/Z
xo’pla/Z
xuro’lla/Z
xo’shla/Z
chag’illa/Z
chakanala/Z
chakichla/Z
chaqna/Z
chalpi/Z
changalla/Z
chanqa/Z
chapla/Z
charla/Z
chati/Z
chegarala/Z
chekkala/Z
chetla/Z
chida/Z
chizella/Z
chiyla/Z
chikirla/Z
chiqchiqla/Z
chimdi/Z
chimchi/Z
ching’illa/Z
chiriqla/Z
chirqilla/Z
chirpira/Z
chixchixla/Z
chokla/Z
chorakla/Z
chuvla/Z
chug’ulla/Z
cho’zinqira/Z
cho’qi/Z
chuldira/Z
cho’pilla/Z
cho’tkala/Z
chuchi/Z
cho’chchangla/Z
shaytonla/Z
shaloqla/Z
shalpilla/Z
shanqi/Z
shatakla/Z
shattala/Z
shivirla/Z
shiig’irla/Z
shiqilla/Z
shilqilla/Z
shingilla/Z
shipangla/Z
shipshipla/Z
shirtilla/Z
shishinqira/Z
shovdira/Z
shonala/Z
shuva/Z
sho’mg’i/Z
egalla/Z
eganla/Z
ezgila/Z
ekla/Z
ekunla/Z
ela/Z
elasla/Z
elqib-yala/Z
ellig’la/Z
elpizla/Z
eltilla/Z
ema/Z
epla/Z
esla/Z
eshkakla/Z
yanchi/Z
yarlaqa/Z
yasha/Z
